esperanto_roots.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+R !Root

!Parts of speech (POS)
+V  !Verb
    +Past   !Past
    +Pres   !Present
    +Fut    !Future
    +Inf    !Infinitive
    +Imp !Imperative

+N !Noun
    +Sing ! Singular
    +Plu !Plural
        +Nom !Nominative
        +Acc !Accusative



! Lexicon containing lexical stems:
LEXICON Root
 mangx R ;!'eat';
 lern R ;!'learn;
 romp R ;!'break';
 vol R ;!'want';
 sxat R ;!'like';
 demand R ;!'ask';
 konstru R ;!'make';
 don R ;!'give';
 elekt R ;!'choose';
 vid R ;!'see';


! Lexicon containing POS tag only:
LEXICON R
+R: R-pos;

! Lexicon containing inflectional suffixes and corresponding tags:
LEXICON R-pos
+V: V-suff;
+N:o Number;
